Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2759YH (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 753 Section 1. Section 384.24, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0l. The acquisition of hazardous material 3 response vehicles and hazardous material response vehicle 4 equipment. 5